Illinois, session 104th, HB1446.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Temporary Firearm Storage Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Firearm" has the meaning given in Section 1.1 of the 8Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.9    "Law enforcement agency" means the Illinois State Police, 10a sheriff's office, a municipal police department, a public 11university police department, or a community college police 12department.13    "Storage agreement" means an agreement between the owner 14of a firearm and either (i) a law enforcement agency or (ii) a 15private entity that established a temporary firearm storage 16program under Section 20 regarding the storage of a firearm 17for a specified period of time.18    "Temporary firearm storage program" means a program 19established under the Act for safely storing firearms outside 20the home of the owner of the firearm. 21    Section 10. Temporary firearm storage by law enforcement 22agencies and the Illinois State Police.   HB1446- 2 -LRB104 05684 RTM 15714 b1    (a) All law enforcement agencies must establish a 2temporary firearm storage program. The Illinois State Police 3must establish a temporary firearm storage program in each 4troop headquarters. 5    (b) Prior to storage, the owner of a firearm must enter 6into a storage agreement with the law enforcement agency 7through which the firearm will be stored. A storage agreement 8may be created only by the owner of a firearm filling out an 9application stating (i) that the owner of the firearm is 10requesting the law enforcement agency to hold the firearm on 11the owner's behalf, (ii) the length of time the firearm will be 12held by the law enforcement agency, and (iii) that the owner of 13the firearm agrees that the firearm shall be turned over to the 14law enforcement agency if the owner of the firearm does not 15retrieve the firearm by the agreed upon time.16    (c) The maximum term for a storage agreement shall be 17determined by the law enforcement agency. An owner of a 18firearm may enter into a new storage agreement under 19subsection (b) to continue to store the firearm under the 20temporary firearm storage program. A law enforcement agency 21may not limit the number of times the owner of a firearm may 22enter into a storage agreement with the law enforcement 23agency.24    (d) A law enforcement agency must send notice to the 25firearm owner before a storage agreement expires. A law 26enforcement agency shall take possession of the firearm after   HB1446- 3 -LRB104 05684 RTM 15714 b1the expiration of the storage agreement if the law enforcement 2agency notified the owner of the firearm that the law 3enforcement agency would take possession of the firearm after 4the expiration of the storage agreement. 5    Section 15. Advertisement. If a law enforcement agency has 6a public-facing website, then it must describe its temporary 7firearm storage program on the website. The description on the 8website shall include a phone number to call to learn about the 9program, a digital copy of the form required for using the 10program, and the requirements for the program. 11    Section 20. Temporary firearm storage by a private entity.12    (a) An individual or business that has a Federal Firearms 13License and is certified by the Illinois State Police under 14the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act may establish a 15temporary firearm storage program.16    (b) Prior to storage, the owner of a firearm must enter 17into a storage agreement with the individual or business. A 18storage agreement may be created only by the owner of a firearm 19filling out a form stating (i) that the owner of the firearm is 20requesting the individual or business to hold the firearm on 21the owner's behalf, (ii) the length of time the firearm will be 22held by the individual or business, and (iii) that the owner of 23the firearm agrees that the firearm shall be turned over to the 24individual or business if the owner of the firearm does not   HB1446- 4 -LRB104 05684 RTM 15714 b1retrieve the firearm by the specified time.2    (c) The maximum term for a storage agreement shall be 3determined by the individual or business. An owner of a 4firearm owner may enter into a new storage agreement under 5subsection (b) to continue to store the firearm under the 6temporary firearm storage program. An individual or business 7may not limit the number of times the owner of a firearm may 8enter into a storage agreement with the individual or 9business.10    (d) An individual or business must send notice to the 11owner of a firearm before a storage agreement expires. An 12individual or business shall take possession of the firearm 13after the expiration of the storage agreement if the 14individual or business notified the owner of the firearm that 15the individual or business would take possession of the 16firearm after the expiration of the storage agreement.17    (e) An individual or business storing a firearm under this 18Section may not use the firearm for any purpose. 19    Section 25. Warrant requirement. A law enforcement agency 20may not use a firearm stored under a temporary firearm storage 21program for any purpose without a warrant. 22    Section 30. Liability. Neither a law enforcement agency 23nor a private entity that establishes a temporary firearm 24storage program under Section 20 shall be held liable for   HB1446- 5 -LRB104 05684 RTM 15714 b1damage to a firearm stored under a temporary firearm storage 2program. 3    Section 35. Safe storage mechanism requirement. A firearm 4may not be stored in a temporary firearm storage program 5without a safe storage mechanism, including, but not limited 6to, a firearm lock. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect one year 8after becoming law.